pl: System miar tablicy do bigowania: Podwójny (imperialny i metryczny); Imperialny (cale); Metryczny (cm/mm); Brak / nieoznaczone; Inny
ja: Craftスコアリングボード測定システム: デュアル (ヤード・ポンド法 + メートル法); ヤード・ポンド法 (インチ); メートル法 (cm / mm); なし / 無地; その他
th: ระบบวัดคะแนน Craft: แบบคู่ (อิมพีเรียล + เมตริก); อิมพีเรียล (นิ้ว); เมตริก (ซม./มม.); ไม่มี/ไม่ทำเครื่องหมาย; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 手工压痕板测量系统: 双制式（英制 + 公制）; 英制（英寸）; 公制（厘米/毫米）; 无/未标记; 其他
sv: Mätningssystem för Craft: Dubbla (imperial + metriskt); Imperial (tum); Metriskt (cm/mm); Ingen/omarkerad; Övrigt
zh-TW: 手作壓線板測量系統: 雙重 (英制 + 公制); 英制 (英吋); 公制 (公分/公釐); 無/未標示; 其他
vi: Hệ thống đo lường bảng điểm Craft: Hệ mét đôi (Anh + Mỹ); Hệ Mỹ (in); Hệ mét (cm/mm); Không/Không đánh dấu; Khác
tr: El iş skor tahtası ölçü sistemi: Çift (İngiliz ölçü birimi + metrik); İngiliz ölçü birimi (inç); Metrik (cm/mm); Yok/İşaretsiz; Diğer
lt-LT: Rankdarbių lankstymo lentos matavimo sistema: Dviguba (imperinė + metrinė); Imperinė (col.); Metrinė (cm / mm); Nėra / nepažymėta; Kita
ro-RO: Sistem de măsurare a tabelei de scor pentru proiecte de artizanat: Dublu (imperial + metric); Imperial (in); Metric (cm/mm); Niciunul/Nemarcat; Altele
es: Sistema de medición del tablero de marcado para manualidades: Doble (imperial + métrico); Imperial (pulgadas); Métrico (cm/mm); Ninguno/Sin marcar; Otro
sl-SI: Merilni sistem desk za ustvarjalno rezbarjenje: Dvojni (imperialni in metrični); Imperialni (palci); Metrični (cm/mm); Brez/neoznačeno; Drugo
hr-HR: Sustav mjerenja ploče za bodovanje za rukotvorine: Dvostruki (imperijalni i metrički); Imperijalni (in); Metrički (cm/mm); Nema / bez oznaka; Ostalo
nb: Målesystem for poengtavler: Dobbel (tommer + metrisk); Britiske mål (tommer); Metrisk (cm/mm); Ingen/umerket; Annet
en: Craft scoring board measurement system: Dual (imperial + metric); Imperial (in); Metric (cm/mm); None/Unmarked; Other
bg-BG: Измервателна система на дъската за биговане при ръчна изработка.: Двойна (имперска + метрична); Имперска (инчове); Метрична (см/мм); Няма/немаркирана; Други
it: Sistema di misurazione per la tabella di valutazione dei Craft: Doppio (imperiale + metrico); Imperiale (in); Metrico (cm/mm); Nessuno/Senza marcatura; Altro
cs: Systém měření rýhovací podložky pro řemeslné použití: Dvojí (imperiální + metrické); Imperiální (palce); Metrické (cm/mm); Žádné/neoznačené; Ostatní
el: Σύστημα μέτρησης πίνακα βαθμολόγησης χειροτεχνίας: Διπλό (βρετανικό + μετρικό); Βρετανικό (in); Μετρικό (cm/mm); Κανένα/Χωρίς σήμανση; Άλλο
de: Maßsystem des Craft-Falzbretts: Duales System (imperial + metrisch); Imperial (Zoll); Metrisch (cm/mm); Keines/Unmarkiert; Andere
ko: 수공예 점수판 측정 시스템: 듀얼(야드파운드법 + 미터법); 야드파운드법(인치); 미터법(cm/mm); 없음/표시 안 됨; 기타
fr: Système de mesure de la plaque de rainurage pour loisirs créatifs: Double (impérial et métrique); Impérial (po); Métrique (cm/mm); Aucun/non marqué; Autre
ru: Система измерений биговальной доски для рукоделия: Двойная (в дюймах и см/мм); Дюймовая (дюймы); Метрическая (см/мм); Нет/без разметки; Другое
pt-PT: Sistema de medição de placa de pontuação Craft: Duplo (imperial + métrico); Imperial (pol.); Métrico (cm/mm); Nenhum/sem marcação; Outro
sk-SK: Merací systém remeselnej ryhovacej podložky: Duálne (imperiálne + metrické); Imperiálne (palce); Metrické (cm/mm); Žiadne/Bez značenia; Iné
nl: Knutselrilbord meetsysteem: Duaal (imperiaal + metrisch); Imperiaal (inch); Metrisch (cm/mm); Geen/ongemarkeerd; Overige
fi: Craft-pistetaulun mittausjärjestelmä: Molemmat (brittiläinen ja metrinen); Brittiläinen (tuuma); Metrinen (cm/mm); Ei mitään / merkitsemätön; Muu
pt-BR: Sistema de medição de prancheta de marcação para artesanato: Duplo (imperial + métrico); Imperial (pol.); Métrico (cm/mm); Nenhum/Sem marcação; Outros
hu: Kézműves bígelőtábla mértékegységrendszere: Kettős (angolszász és metrikus); Angolszász (hüvelyk); Metrikus (cm/mm); Nincs/jelöletlen; Egyéb
da: Håndværkspointtavlens målesystem: Dobbelt (imperial + metrisk); Imperial (tommer); Metrisk (cm/mm); Ingen/ikke markeret; Andet